Arkansas, session 2025, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of the Governor for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) GOV09G GOV CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE EXE02
(2) GOV17G GOV DEPUTY CHIEF OF STAFF 2 GRADE EXE01
(3) GOV08G GOV CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE SPC11
(4) GOV34G GOV SENIOR ADVISOR 1 GRADE SPC11
(5) GOV12G GOV COMMUNICATIONS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SPC08
*JAR011*
04-07-2025 17:00:41 JAR011

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB41
(6) GOV25G GOV LEG/POLICY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SPC08
(7) GOV35G GOV SENIOR POLICY ADVISOR 1 GRADE SPC08
(8) GOV05G GOV ATTORNEY III 2 GRADE SPC07
(9) GOV07G GOV BUDGET DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SPC06
(10) GOV13G GOV COMMUNICATIONS SENIOR ADVISOR 1 GRADE SPC06
(11) GOV20G GOV DEPUTY DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE SPC06
(12) GOV04G GOV ATTORNEY II 2 GRADE SPC05
(13) GOV36G GOV SENIOR POLICY MANAGER 1 GRADE SPC05
(14) GOV32G GOV POLICY MANAGER 2 GRADE SPC05
(15) GOV11G GOV COMMUNICATIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC01
(16) GOV28G GOV PHOTOGRAPHER 1 GRADE SPC02
(17) GOV29G GOV POLICY ADVISOR 5 GRADE SPC02
(18) GOV26G GOV LEGAL SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC01
(19) GOV31G GOV POLICY COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC01
(20) GOV21G GOV DIRECTOR OF BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS 1 GRADE SGS10
(21) GOV22G GOV DIRECTOR OF CONSTITUENT SERVICES 1 GRADE SGS10
(22) GOV24G GOV EXECUTIVE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS09
(23) GOV33G GOV SCHEDULER 1 GRADE SGS09
(24) GOV03G GOV ADVANCE AND COALITIONS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SGS08
(25) GOV27G GOV OFFICE MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS08
(26) GOV37G GOV OFFICE STAFF 9 GRADE SGS08
(27) GOV19G GOV DEPUTY DIR OF BOARDS & COMMISSIONS 1 GRADE SGS07
(28) GOV18G GOV DEPUTY DIR OF ADVANCE & COALITIONS 1 GRADE SGS06
(29) GOV02G GOV ADVANCE AND COALITIONS COORDINATOR 5 GRADE SGS05
(30) GOV06G GOV BOARDS & COMMISSIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS05
(31) GOV15G GOV CONSTITUENT SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS05
(32) GOV23G GOV EXECUTIVE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS05
(33) GOV01G GOV ADVANCE AND COALITIONS AIDE 1 GRADE SGS04
(34) GOV10G GOV COMMUNICATIONS AIDE 1 GRADE SGS04
(35) GOV14G GOV CONSTITUENT SERVICES AIDE 3 GRADE SGS04
(36) GOV30G GOV POLICY AIDE 1 GRADE SGS04
(37) GOV16G GOV CONSTITUENT SERVICES STAFF 1 GRADE SGS01
MAX NO. OF EMPLOYEES 59

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Office of the Governor for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
04-07-2025 17:00:41 JAR011

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB41
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: seven (7)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Office of the Governor, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Office of the
Governor for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,504,822
(02) EXTRA HELP 8,789
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,502,658
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 446,706
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,200
(C) PROF. FEES 14,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,492,175

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY PROCLAMATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Governor, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for the purpose provided by Arkansas Code 19-2-
404, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY PROCLAMATION $500,000

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
04-07-2025 17:00:41 JAR011

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB41
of the State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the Agency is authorized to transfer appropriation from any
line item authorized in Operations Appropriation of the Governor’s Office in
this Act to any other line item authorized in Operations Appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
04-07-2025 17:00:41 JAR011

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB41
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

































04-07-2025 17:00:41 JAR011